Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB672.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 635.11. Coverage of Allergenic Protein Dietary Supplements.--(a) An insurer that offers, issues or renews a health insurance policy in this Commonwealth shall provide coverage to an insured for at least one of the following:(1) An early egg allergen introduction dietary supplement.(2) An early peanut allergen introduction dietary supplement.(b) An insurer shall provide the coverage under subsection (a) to the insured at no additional cost, including cost-sharing.(c) Except as provided in subsection (b), nothing in this 20250HB0672PN0679 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section shall be construed as preventing a health insurance policy from imposing cost-sharing.(d) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Cost-sharing" means:(1) The share of the health care costs covered by a health insurance policy that an insured pays out of pocket.(2) The term includes a deductible, coinsurance, copayment or similar charge."Dietary supplement" means as defined in 21 U.S.C. § 321(ff) (relating to definitions; generally)."Early egg allergen introduction dietary supplement" means a dietary supplement that:(1) is prescribed to an infant by a health care practitioner; and(2) contains sufficient infant-safe, well-cooked egg protein to reduce the risk of food allergies."Early peanut allergen introduction dietary supplement" means a dietary supplement that: (1) is prescribed to an infant by a health care practitioner; and(2) contains sufficient infant-safe peanut protein to reduce the risk of food allergies."Health care practitioner" means an individual who is authorized to practice some component of the healing arts by a license, permit, certificate or registration issued by a Commonwealth licensing agency or board." Health insurance policy" means: (1) A policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan 20250HB0672PN0679 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 issued by an insurer that provides medical or health care coverage.(2) The term does not include any of the following:(i) An accident only policy.(ii ) A credit only policy. (iii) A long-term care or disability income policy.(iv) A specified disease policy.(v) A Medicare supplement policy.(vi) A fixed indemnity policy.(vii) A dental only policy.(viii) A vision only policy.(ix) A workers' compensation policy.(x) An automobile medical payment policy.(xi) A policy under which benefits are provided by the Federal Government to active or former military personnel and their dependents.(xii) A hospital indemnity policy.(xiii) Any other similar policies providing for limited benefits."Infant" means an individual who is under one year of age."Insurer" means an entity that offers, issues or renews an individual or group health insurance policy that provides medical or health care coverage by a health care facility or health care practitioner and that is governed under any of the following:(1) This act, including section 630 and Article XXIV.(2) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the "Health Maintenance Organization Act."(3) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations).20250HB0672PN0679 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations).Section 2. This act shall apply to health insurance policies offered, issued or renewed on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0672PN0679 - 5 - 123456